de: Gesundheitsschädlich beim Einatmen\, Verschlucken und Berührung mit der Haut, R20/21/22
en: Harmful by inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R20/21/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při vdechování\, styku s kůží a při požití, R20/21/22
dk: Farlig ved indånding\, ved hudkontakt og ved indtagelse, R20/21/22
el: Επιβλαβές όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R20/21/22
es: Nocivo por inhalación\, por ingestión y en contacto con la piel, R20/21/22
et: Kahjulik sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R20/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R20/21/22
fr: Nocif par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R20/21/22
hu: Belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve ártalmas, R20/21/22
it: Nocivo per inalazione\, contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R20/21/22
lt: Kenksminga įkvėpus\, susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R20/21/22
lv: Kaitīgs ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R20/21/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jinxtamm\, imiss il-ġilda jew jinbela', R20/21/22
nl: Schadelijk bij inademing\, opname door de mond en aanraking met de huid, R20/21/22
no: Farlig ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R20/21/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu, R20/21/22
pt: Nocivo por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R20/21/22
sk: Škodlivý pri vdý chnutí\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R20/21/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo pri vdihavanju\, v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R20/21/22
sv: Farligt vid inandning\, vid hudkontakt och vid förtäring, R20/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich beim Einatmen und Verschlucken, R20/22
en: Harmful by inhalation and if swallowed, R20/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při vdechování a při požití, R20/22
dk: Farlig ved indånding og ved indtagelse, R20/22
el: Επιβλαβές όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R20/22
es: Nocivo por inhalación y por ingestión, R20/22
et: Kahjulik sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R20/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R20/22
fr: Nocif par inhalation et par ingestion, R20/22
hu: Belélegezve és lenyelve ártalmas, R20/22
it: Nocivo per inalazione e ingestione, R20/22
lt: Kenksminga įkvėpus ir prarijus, R20/22
lv: Kaitīgs ieelpojot un norijot, R20/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jinxtamm jew jinbela', R20/22
nl: Schadelijk bij inademing en opname door de mond, R20/22
no: Farlig ved innånding og svelging, R20/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu, R20/22
pt: Nocivo por inalação e ingestão, R20/22
sk: Škodlivý pri vdý chnutí a po požití, R20/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo pri vdihavanju in pri zaužitju, R20/22
sv: Farligt vid inandning och vid förtäring, R20/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich bei Berührung mit der Haut, R21
en: Harmful in contact with skin, R21
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při styku s kůží, R21
dk: Farlig ved hudkontakt, R21
el: Επιβλαβές σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R21
es: Nocivo en contacto con la piel, R21
et: Kahjulik kokkupuutel nahaga, R21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista joutuessaan iholle, R21
fr: Nocif par contact avec la peau, R21
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve ártalmas, R21
it: Nocivo a contatto con la pelle, R21
lt: Kenksminga susilietus su oda, R21
lv: Kaitīgs\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R21
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jmiss il-ġilda, R21
nl: Schadelijk bij aanraking met de huid, R21
no: Farlig ved hudkontakt, R21
pl: Działa szkodliwie w kontakcie ze skórą, R21
pt: Nocivo em contacto com a pele, R21
sk: Škodlivý pri kontakte s pokožkou, R21
sl: Zdravju škodljivo v stiku s kožo, R21
sv: Farligt vid hudkontakt, R21

de: Gesundheitsschädlich bei Berührung mit der Haut und beim Verschlucken, R21/22
en: Harmful in contact with skin and if swallowed, R21/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při styku s kůží a při požití, R21/22
dk: Farlig ved hudkontakt og ved indtagelse, R21/22
el: Επιβλαβές σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R21/22
es: Nocivo en contacto con la piel y por ingestión, R21/22
et: Kahjulik kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R21/22
fr: Nocif par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R21/22
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve ártalmas, R21/22
it: Nocivo a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R21/22
lt: Kenksminga susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R21/22
lv: Kaitīgs\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R21/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jmiss il-ġilda jew jinbela', R21/22
nl: Schadelijk bij aanraking met de huid en bij opname door de mond, R21/22
no: Farlig ved hudkontakt og svelging, R21/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu, R21/22
pt: Nocivo em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R21/22
sk: Škodlivý pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R21/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R21/22
sv: Farligt vid hudkontakt och förtäring, R21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich beim Verschlucken, R22
en: Harmful if swallowed, R22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při požití, R22
dk: Farlig ved indtagelse, R22
el: Επιβλαβές σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R22
es: Nocivo por ingestión, R22
et: Kahjulik allaneelamisel, R22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista nieltynä, R22
fr: Nocif en cas d'ingestion, R22
hu: Lenyelve ártalmas, R22
it: Nocivo per ingestione, R22
lt: Kenksminga prarijus, R22
lv: Kaitīgs norijot, R22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jinbela', R22
nl: Schadelijk bij opname door de mond, R22
no: Farlig ved svelging, R22
pl: Działa szkodliwie po połknięciu, R22
pt: Nocivo por ingestão, R22
sk: Škodlivý po požití, R22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo pri zaužitju, R22
sv: Farligt vid förtäring, R22

es: Tóxico
en: Toxic
da: Giftig
de: Giftig
el: Τοξικό
fi: Myrkyllinen
fr: Toxique
it: Tossico
nl: Vergiftig
pt: Tóxico
sv: Giftig

de: Giftig beim Einatmen, R23
en: Toxic by inhalation, R23
cs: Toxický při vdechování, R23
dk: Giftig ved indånding, R23
el: Τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται, R23
es: Tóxico por inhalación, R23
et: Mürgine sissehingamisel, R23
fi: Myrkyllistä hengitettynä, R23
fr: Toxique par inhalation, R23
hu: Belélegezve mérgező (toxikus), R23
it: Tossico per inalazione, R23
lt: Toksiška įkvėpus, R23
lv: Toksisks ieelpojot, R23
mt: Tossiku meta jinxtamm, R23
nl: Vergiftig bij inademing, R23
no: Giftig ved innånding, R23
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe, R23
pt: Tóxico por inalação, R23
sk: Jedovatý pri vdýchnutí, R23
sl: Strupeno pri vdihavanju, R23
sv: Giftigt vid inandning, R23

de: Giftig beim Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R23/24
en: Toxic by inhalation and in contact with skin, R23/24
cs: Toxický při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R23/24
dk: Giftig ved indånding og ved hudkontakt, R23/24
el: Τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R23/24
es: Tóxico por inhalación y en contacto con la piel, R23/24
et: Mürgine sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R23/24
fi: Myrkyllistä hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R23/24
fr: Toxique par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R23/24
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve mérgező, R23/24
it: Tossico per inalazione e contatto con la pelle, R23/24
lt: Toksiška įkvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R23/24
lv: Toksisks ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R23/24
mt: Tossiku meta jinxtamm u meta jmiss il-ġilda, R23/24
nl: Vergiftig bij inademing en bij aanraking met de huid, R23/24
no: Giftig ved innånding og hudkontakt, R23/24
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą, R23/24
pt: Tóxico por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R23/24
sk: Jedovatý pri vdýchnutí a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R23/24
sl: Strupeno pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R23/24
sv: Giftigt vid inandning och hudkontakt, R23/24

de: Giftig beim Einatmen\, Verschlucken und Berührung mit der Haut, R23/24/25
en: Toxic by inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R23/24/25
cs: Toxický při vdechování\, styku s kůží a při požití, R23/24/25
dk: Giftig ved indånding\, ved hudkontakt og ved indtagelse, R23/24/25
el: Τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R23/24/25
es: Tóxico por inhalación\, por ingestión y en contacto con la piel, R23/24/25
et: Mürgine sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R23/24/25
fi: Myrkyllistä hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R23/24/25
fr: Toxique par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R23/24/25
hu: Belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve mérgező, R23/24/25
it: Tossico per inalazione\, contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R23/24/25
lt: Toksiška įkvėpus\, susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R23/24/25
lv: Toksisks ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R23/24/25
mt: Tossiku meta jinxtamm\, imiss il-ġilda jew jinbela', R23/24/25
nl: Vergiftig bij inademing\, opname door de mond en aanraking met de huid, R23/24/25
no: Giftig ved innånding\, ved hudkontakt og svelging, R23/24/25
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu, R23/24/25
pt: Tóxico por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R23/24/25
sk: Jedovatý pri vdýchnutí\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R23/24/25
sl: Strupeno pri vdihavanju\, v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R23/24/25
sv: Giftigt vid inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R23/24/25

de: Giftig beim Einatmen und Verschlucken, R23/25
en: Toxic by inhalation and if swallowed, R23/25
cs: Toxický při vdechování a při požití, R23/25
dk: Giftig ved indånding og ved indtagelse, R23/25
el: Τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R23/25
es: Tóxico por inhalación y por ingestión, R23/25
et: Mürgine sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R23/25
fi: Myrkyllistä hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R23/25
fr: Toxique par inhalation et par ingestion, R23/25
hu: Belélegezve és lenyelve mérgező, R23/25
it: Tossico per inalazione e ingestione, R23/25
lt: Toksiška įkvėpus ir prarijus, R23/25
lv: Toksisks ieelpojot un norijot, R23/25
mt: Tossiku meta jinxtamm jew meta jinbela', R23/25
nl: Vergiftig bij inademing en opname door de mond, R23/25
no: Giftig ved innånding og svelging, R23/25
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu, R23/25
pt: Tóxico por inalação e ingestão, R23/25
sk: Jedovatý pri vdýchnutí a po požití, R23/25
sl: Strupeno pri vdihavanju in pri zaužitju, R23/25
sv: Giftigt vid inandning och förtäring, R23/25

de: Giftig bei Berührung mit der Haut, R24
en: Toxic in contact with skin, R24
cs: Toxický při styku s kůží, R24
dk: Giftig ved hudkontakt, R24
el: Τοξικό σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R24
es: Tóxico en contacto con la piel, R24
et: Mürgine kokkupuutel nahaga, R24
fi: Myrkyllistä joutuessaan iholle, R24
fr: Toxique par contact avec la peau, R24
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve mérgező (toxikus), R24
it: Tossico a contatto con la pelle, R24
lt: Toksiška susilietus su oda, R24
lv: Toksisks\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R24
mt: Tossiku meta jmiss il-ġilda, R24
nl: Vergiftig bij aanraking met de huid, R24
no: Giftig ved hudkontakt, R24
pl: Działa toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą, R24
pt: Tóxico em contacto com a pele, R24
sk: Jedovatý pri kontakte s pokožkou, R24
sl: Strupeno v stiku s kožo, R24
sv: Giftigt vid hudkontakt, R24

de: Giftig bei Berührung mit der Haut und beim Verschlucken, R24/25
en: Toxic in contact with skin and if swallowed, R24/25
cs: Toxický při styku s kůží a při požití, R24/25
dk: Giftig ved hudkontakt og ved indtagelse, R24/25
el: Τοξικό σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R24/25
es: Tóxico en contacto con la piel y por ingestión, R24/25
et: Mürgine kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R24/25
fi: Myrkyllistä joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R24/25
fr: Toxique par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R24/25
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve mérgező, R24/25
it: Tossico a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R24/25
lt: Toksiška susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R24/25
lv: Toksisks\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R24/25
mt: Tossiku meta jmiss il-ġilda jew meta jinbela', R24/25
nl: Vergiftig bij aanraking met de huid en bij opname door de mond, R24/25
no: Giftig ved hudkontakt og svelging, R24/25
pl: Działa toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu, R24/25
pt: Tóxico em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R24/25
sk: Jedovatý pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R24/25
sl: Strupeno v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R24/25
sv: Giftigt vid hudkontakt och förtäring, R24/25

de: Giftig beim Verschlucken, R25
en: Toxic if swallowed, R25
cs: Toxický při požití, R25
dk: Giftig ved indtagelse, R25
el: Τοξικό σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R25
es: Tóxico por ingestión, R25
et: Mürgine allaneelamisel, R25
fi: Myrkyllistä nieltynä, R25
fr: Toxique en cas d'ingestion, R25
hu: Lenyelve mérgező (toxikus), R25
it: Tossico per ingestione, R25
lt: Toksiška prarijus, R25
lv: Toksisks norijot, R25
mt: Tossiku jekk jinbela', R25
nl: Vergiftig bij opname door de mond, R25
no: Giftig ved svelging, R25
pl: Działa toksycznie po połknięciu, R25
pt: Tóxico por ingestão, R25
sk: Jedovatý po požití, R25
sl: Strupeno pri zaužitju, R25
sv: Giftigt vid förtäring, R25

es: Muy tóxico
en: Very toxic
da: Meget giftig
de: Sehr giftig
el: Πολύ τοξικό
fi: Erittäin myrkyllinen
fr: Très toxique
it: Molto tossico
nl: Zeer vergiftig
pt: Muito tóxico
sv: Mycket giftig

de: Sehr giftig beim Einatmen, R26
en: Very toxic by inhalation, R26
cs: Vysoce toxický při vdechování, R26
dk: Meget giftig ved indånding, R26
el: Πολύ τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται, R26
es: Muy tóxico por inhalación, R26
et: Väga mürgine sissehingamisel, R26
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä hengitettynä, R26
fr: Très toxique par inhalation, R26
hu: Belélegezve nagyon mérgező (toxikus), R26
it: Molto tossico per inalazione, R26
lt: Labai toksiška įkvėpus, R26
lv: Ļoti toksisks ieelpojot, R26
mt: Tossiku ħafna meta jinxtamm, R26
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij inademing, R26
no: Meget giftig ved innånding, R26
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe, R26
pt: Muito tóxico por inalação, R26
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pri vdýchnutí, R26
sl: Zelo strupeno pri vdihavanju, R26
sv: Mycket giftigt vid inandning, R26

de: Sehr giftig beim Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R26/27
en: Very toxic by inhalation and in contact with skin, R26/27
cs: Vysoce toxický při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R26/27
dk: Meget giftig ved indånding og ved hudkontakt, R26/27
el: Πολύ τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R26/27
es: Muy tóxico por inhalación y en contacto con la piel, R26/27
et: Väga mürgine sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R26/27
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R26/27
fr: Très toxique par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R26/27
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve nagyon mérgező, R26/27
it: Molto tossico per inalazione e contatto con la pelle, R26/27
lt: Labai toksiška įkvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R26/27
lv: Ļoti toksisks ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R26/27
mt: Tossiku ħafna meta jinxtamm u meta jmiss il-ġilda, R26/27
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij inademing en bij aanraking met de huid, R26/27
no: Meget giftig ved innånding og hudkontakt, R26/27
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą, R26/27
pt: Muito tóxico por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R26/27
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pri vdýchnutí a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R26/27
sl: Zelo strupeno pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R26/27
sv: Mycket giftigt vid inandning och hudkontakt, R26/27

de: Sehr giftig beim Einatmen\, Verschlucken und Berührung mit der Haut, R26/27/28
en: Very toxic by inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R26/27/28
cs: Vysoce toxický při vdechování\, styku s kůží a při požití, R26/27/28
dk: Meget giftig ved indånding\, ved hudkontakt og ved indtagelse, R26/27/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περί- πτωση καταπόσεως, R26/27/28
es: Muy tóxico por inhalación\, por ingestión y en contacto con la piel, R26/27/28
et: Väga mürgine sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R26/27/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R26/27/28
fr: Très toxique par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R26/27/28
hu: Belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve nagyon mérgező, R26/27/28
it: Molto tossico per inalazione\, contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R26/27/28
lt: Labai toksiška įkvėpus\, susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R26/27/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R26/27/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna meta jinxtamm\, imiss il-ġilda jew meta jinbela', R26/27/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij inademing\, opname door de mond en aanraking met de huid, R26/27/28
no: Meget giftig ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R26/27/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu, R26/27/28
pt: Muito tóxico por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R26/27/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pri vdýchnutí\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R26/27/28
sl: Zelo strupeno pri vdihavanju\, v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R26/27/28
sv: Mycket giftigt vid inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R26/27/28

de: Sehr giftig beim Einatmen und Verschlucken, R26/28
en: Very toxic by inhalation and if swallowed, R26/28
cs: Vysoce toxický při vdechování a při požití, R26/28
dk: Meget giftig ved indånding og ved indtagelse, R26/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R26/28
es: Muy tóxico por inhalación y por ingestión, R26/28
et: Väga mürgine sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R26/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R26/28
fr: Très toxique par inhalation et par ingestion, R26/28
hu: Belélegezve és lenyelve nagyon mérgező, R26/28
it: Molto tossico per inalazione e per ingestione, R26/28
lt: Labai toksiška įkvėpus ir prarijus, R26/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks ieelpojot un norijot, R26/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna meta jinxtamm jew meta jinbela', R26/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij inademing en opname door de mond, R26/28
no: Meget giftig ved innånding og svelging, R26/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu, R26/28
pt: Muito tóxico por inalação e ingestão, R26/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pri vdýchnutí a po požití, R26/28
sl: Zelo strupeno pri vdihavanju in pri zaužitju, R26/28
sv: Mycket giftigt vid inandning och förtäring, R26/28

de: Sehr giftig bei Berührung mit der Haut, R27
en: Very toxic in contact with skin, R27
cs: Vysoce toxický při styku s kůží, R27
dk: Meget giftig ved hudkontakt, R27
el: Πολύ τοξικό σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R27
es: Muy tóxico en contacto con la piel, R27
et: Väga mürgine kokkupuutel nahaga, R27
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä joutuessaan iholle, R27
fr: Très toxique par contact avec la peau, R27
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve nagyon mérgező (toxikus), R27
it: Molto tossico a contatto con la pelle, R27
lt: Labai toksiška susilietus su oda, R27
lv: Ļoti toksisks\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R27
mt: Tossiku ħafna meta jmiss il-ġilda, R27
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij aanraking met de huid, R27
no: Meget giftig ved hudkontakt, R27
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą, R27
pt: Muito tóxico em contacto com a pele, R27
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pri kontakte s pokožkou, R27
sl: Zelo strupeno v stiku s kožo, R27
sv: Mycket giftigt vid hudkontakt, R27

de: Kann Krebs erzeugen, R45
en: May cause cancer, R45
cs: Může vyvolat rakovinu, R45
dk: Kan fremkalde kræft, R45
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει καρκίνο, R45
es: Puede causar cáncer, R45
et: Võib põhjustada vähktõbe, R45
fi: Aiheuttaa syöpäsairauden vaaraa, R45
fr: Peut provoquer le cancer, R45
hu: Rákot okozhat (karcinogén hatású lehet), R45
it: Può provocare il cancro, R45
lt: Gali sukelti vėžį, R45
lv: Kancerogēna viela, R45
mt: Jista' jġib il-kanċer, R45
nl: Kan kanker veroorzaken, R45
no: Fare for kreft, R45
pl: Może powodować raka, R45
pt: Pode causar cancro, R45
sk: Môže spôsobit’ rakovinu, R45
sl: Lahko povzroči raka, R45
sv: Kan ge kancer, R45